test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-glossing.yaml
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonymiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonymiwaabniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonyminwibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonyminwibniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyminwibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsmiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsmiwaabniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsminwibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsminwibniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsminwibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonyshinaanbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonyshinaanbaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonyshinaanbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonsshinaanbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonsshinaanbaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsshinaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonyshinaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonyshinaanbaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonyshinaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonyshiwaabniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonyshiwaabniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonyshiwaabniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonsshinaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsshinaanbaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsshinaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonsshiwaabniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsshiwaabniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsshiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonyshiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonyshiwaabniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyshiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonyshinwibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonyshinwibniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyshinwibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsshiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsshiwaabniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsshiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsshinwibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsshinwibniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsshinwibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignomshinaanbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignomshinaanbaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignomshinaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignomshinaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignomshinaanbaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignomshinaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignomshiwaabniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignomshiwaabniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignomshiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: bagwaaniignomshiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignomshiwaabniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignomshiwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: bagwaaniignomshinwibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignomshinwibniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignomshinwibniin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonymishnaanbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonymishnaanbaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonymishnaanbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonsmishnaanbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonsmishnaanbaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsmishnaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonymishnaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonymishnaanbaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonymishnaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonymishwaabniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonymishwaabniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonymishwaabniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonsmishnaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsmishnaanbaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsmishnaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonsmishwaabniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsmishwaabniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsmishwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonymishwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonymishwaabniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymishwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonymishniwbaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonymishniwbaniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymishniwbaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsmishwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsmishwaabniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmishwaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsmishniwbaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsmishniwbaniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmishniwbaniin
     
